Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
Energy Conservation Improvements

58.600.
Definitions for KRS 58.600 to 58.610.

As used in KRS

58.600

to

58.610

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Energy conservation revenue bonds” or “bonds” means securities issued by a local public agency in accordance with the provisions of KRS

58.600

to

58.610

to pay for energy conservation measures under guaranteed energy savings contracts;

“Energy conservation measure” means a facility alteration designed to reduce energy consumption or operating costs, and may include one (1) or more of the following:

Insulation of building structure or systems within buildings;

Storm windows or doors, caulking or weatherstripping, multiple pane windows or doors, heat absorbing or heat reflective glazing for windows and doors, additional glazing, reductions in glass area or other window and door systems modifications that reduce energy consumption;

Automated or computerized energy control systems;

Heating, ventilating, or air conditioning system modifications or replacements;

Replacement or modification of lighting fixtures to increase energy efficiency of the lighting system without increasing the overall illumination of the building, unless an increase in illumination is necessary to conform to applicable state or local building codes for the lighting system after the proposed modifications are made;

Energy recovery systems;

Cogeneration systems that produce steam or forms of energy such as heat as well as electricity for use primarily within a building or complex of buildings;

Energy conservation measures that provide long-term operating cost reductions; or

Any life safety measures that provide long-term operating cost reductions;

“Local public agency” means a city, county, charter county, urban-county, school district, special district, or an agency formed by a combination of these agencies under KRS Chapter 79;

“Capital cost avoidance” has the same definition as in KRS

45A.345

; and

“Guaranteed energy savings contract” has the same definition as in KRS

45A.345

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 213, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 375, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 63, § 13, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2006). In subsection (5) of this statute, the Reviser of Statutes has changed a reference to “KRS 45A.345(26)” to read “KRS 45A.345(27),” in order to correct an error resulting from the renumbering of subsections in
1998 Ky. Acts ch. 120, sec. 12, and
ch. 375, sec. 2. See
KRS 7.136(1)(e) and (h).

58.605.
Energy conservation revenue bonds for energy conservation measures — Procedure.

Subject to the reporting and approval requirements in KRS

45A.352

,

45A.353

, and

58.610

, any local public agency may issue energy conservation revenue bonds to pay for the cost of energy conservation measures under guaranteed energy savings contracts for the purpose of reducing the cost of energy to buildings owned or operated by the local public agency by making energy-saving improvements to these buildings.

A local public agency, or an agency acting on its behalf, may issue energy conservation revenue bonds to finance the energy conservation measures under guaranteed energy savings contracts, with the following limitations:

Any energy conservation measure, financed through bonds, shall comply with the provisions set forth in KRS

45A.345

,

45A.352

, and

45A.353

;

The term of the bonds shall run coterminous with the term of guaranteed energy savings contract;

A local public agency shall not enter into a guaranteed energy savings contract where the total cost of the energy conservation measures exceeds the cost of the energy savings plus the operational costs plus the capital cost avoidance that is estimated for the term of the guaranteed energy savings contract commencing from the date of the energy conservation measure’s installation; and

The use of capital cost avoidance shall be subject to the following restrictions:

The amount expended shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the project cost; and

Capital cost avoidance shall be restricted to payment for permanent equipment replacement as follows:

Storm windows or doors, multiglazed windows or doors, additional glazing, and reduction in glass area;

Replacement of heating, ventilating, or air conditioning major components or systems;

New lighting fixtures where required to achieve Illuminating Engineering Society of North America (IES) standards, provided the existing light fixtures shall have been determined to be obsolete and incapable of achieving IES standards; and

Life safety system replacements or upgrades which shall have been determined to be necessary to conform with existing state and local codes and standards.

Energy conservation revenue bonds shall be issued in accordance with the provisions of KRS

58.010

to

58.140

and shall be sold at a competitive sale preceded by adequate public notice and shall bear interest at an interest rate or rates determined by the local public agency at the time of the sale.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 213, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 120, § 31, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 375, § 7, effective July 15, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by 1998 Ky. Acts chs. 120 and 375 which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

58.610.
Issuance by school districts, county and city government, or special district — Special procedure.

Energy conservation revenue bonds authorized under KRS

58.600

to

58.610

issued by or on behalf of a school district shall be approved or disapproved by the chief state school officer based on consideration of the following criteria:

Funding capability of the school;

The availability of general fund, capital outlay allotment under KRS

157.420

, or state and local funds from the Facility Support Program of Kentucky under KRS

157.440

, that are to be contributed by the school district as capital cost avoidance; and

Proper bond documentation.

Guaranteed energy savings and guaranteed operational savings of a guaranteed energy savings contract shall be exempt from current or future debt limitations, except that capital cost avoidance, as defined in KRS

58.600

, shall not be exempt from current or future debt limitations.

No energy conservation revenue bonds authorized under KRS

58.600

to

58.610

shall be issued by or on behalf of a county, urban-county government, charter county government, city, or special district without the prior approval of the state local debt officer, except that this approval shall not be required if the principal amount of energy conservation revenue bonds is less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

Any issuance of energy conservation revenue bonds shall be reported to the state local debt officer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 213, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 375, § 8, effective July 15, 1998.

58.615.
Authority for administrative regulations. [Repealed.]